California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(1) Responding to, managing, and controlling the effects of the spread of glassy-winged sharpshooter and other designated pests and diseases that attack table grape plants.

(2) Collecting and disseminating to table grape growers in the district relevant information and scientific studies concerning the pest or pests.

(3) Charting and determining the extent and location of any Pierce’s disease infestations and infestations of other designated pests and diseases.

(4) Reimbursing the county or counties in which the district is located for expenses incurred in connection with providing services under this article that are not otherwise reimbursed.

(c) (1) The annual assessment shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per planted acre.

(2) The maximum annual assessment shall be established in accordance with the voting requirements of Articles XIIIC and XIIID of the California Constitution, as incorporated by Proposition 218 of 1996, as provided for in Section 6047.100.

(3) The board shall annually establish the assessment which shall not exceed the maximum annual assessment specified in paragraph (1), except as otherwise specified in this section.

(d) An annual assessment greater than the amount provided for in this section may not be charged unless a greater assessment is approved by eligible owners in accordance with the voting requirements of Articles XIIIC and XIIID of the California Constitution, as incorporated by Proposition 218 of 1996, as provided for in Section 6047.100.

(e) The board of supervisors shall cause to be prepared and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors a written report that contains all of the following information:

(1) A description of each parcel of property proposed to be subject to the assessment.

(2) The amount of the assessment of each parcel for the initial fiscal year.

(3) The maximum amount of the assessment that may be levied for each parcel during any fiscal year.

(4) The duration of the assessment.

(5) The basis of the assessment.

(6) The schedule of the assessment.

(7) A description specifying the requirements for written and oral protests, and the protest threshold necessary for requiring abandonment of the proposed assessment pursuant to subdivision (f).

(f) Unless otherwise excluded, the assessment shall be levied on each parcel within the boundaries of the district, zone, or area of benefit.

(g) (1) The board of supervisors shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(2) In addition, the mailed notice shall include the name of the district, the return address of the sender, the amount of the assessment for the initial fiscal year, the maximum amount of the assessment that may be levied during any fiscal year and the name and telephone number of the person designated by the board of supervisors to answer inquiries regarding the protest proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 20.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.98.

The assessment authorized to be assessed and levied is hereby declared to be in the nature of a special assessment, and the Legislature hereby finds that the owners of all table grape plants will be benefited by the district to the same extent and in the same manner regardless of the age of the plants. The assessments authorized by this article shall be assessed and levied regardless of the age of the table grape plants growing on the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.99.

(a) The assessment levied shall be computed and entered upon the assessment roll by the county auditor, and if the supervisors fail to levy the assessment as required, the auditor shall do so.

(b) The assessment shall be collected at the same time, and in the same manner as, and together with and not separate from, general county taxes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.100.

The general provisions of the laws of this state, prescribing the requirements for and manner of levying and collecting county taxes and the duties of the several county officers with respect to levying and collecting county taxes, are, so far as they are applicable and not in conflict with the specific provisions of this article, hereby adopted and made a part of this article. This article, however, shall operate so as to be compliant with Article XIII (C) and XIII (D) of the California Constitution, as incorporated by Proposition 218 of 1996. The several county officers referred to shall be liable upon their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of the duties imposed upon them by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.101.

The revenue from the assessments imposed pursuant to this article by the district are trust funds and shall be encumbered only for the purposes for which the district is formed and for the benefit of the acreage assessed. The district shall expend the minimum amount necessary for overhead and other administrative costs. No district funds shall be donated, loaned, or transferred to any other local agency or to the state for any purpose, except for the implementation of the duties of the district, set forth under this article, as determined to be necessary by the district board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 21.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.102.

(a) The county treasury shall be the repository of all the moneys of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for all those moneys, and place them to the credit of the district.

(b) The county treasurer shall be responsible upon his or her official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner provided in this article, of all moneys held in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.103.

If a consolidated district includes parts of two or more counties, the repository of all money of the district shall be the county treasury of the county in which is located the largest area of table grape acreage of the district. Money collected for the use of the district in any other county in which a part of the district is located shall be transferred by the county treasurer upon warrant of the county auditor of the county in which the money was collected to the county treasurer of the county serving as repository for the district, in the same manner as prescribed for the disbursement of money held for a local district. Money derived from any county in which the district is located may be expended in any part of the district for the purposes authorized by this article, notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting the expenditure of any money to a specific area or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.104.

(a) The county treasurer shall pay out money of the district only upon warrants of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson and attested to by the secretary. The county treasurer, with the approval of the board of supervisors, shall pay out the money of the district upon one master warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district and signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson and attested to by the secretary, to meet the district’s expenses, including salaries, at intervals approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) The county treasurer shall report, in writing, on the first day of July, October, January, and March of each year, to the board of directors, the amount of money the treasurer then holds for the district, the amount of receipts since the last report, and the amounts paid out. Each report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the district to whom it is addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.105.

Acreage devoted exclusively to the growing of table grapes within a tract of land outside the district, but in the county in which the district is located, may be annexed to the district in the same manner provided in this article for the formation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 22.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.106.

Any two or more districts organized or existing under this article may be consolidated, whether or not the boundaries are coterminous, and whether or not the districts are located in the same county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.107.

The board of directors may adopt a resolution that recites the fact of receipt and the willingness of the district to consolidate, and shall then send copies of the resolution to the board of directors of each of the other districts. The board shall send a certified copy of the resolution to the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of table grape acreage of the proposed consolidated district, and a copy of the resolution to the board of supervisors of each of the other counties in which is located any part of the proposed consolidated district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.108.

The board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of table grape acreage of the proposed consolidated district shall fix a time and place for hearing the proposal. Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in the same manner and with the same effect as prescribed for the formation of a district pursuant to Sections 6047.70, 6047.71, 6047.72, 6047.73, and 6047.74.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.109.

If the board of supervisors determines that consolidation is feasible and in the best interests of the table grape acreage owners of the respective districts, it shall, by resolution duly adopted, declare the districts consolidated into one district, giving the consolidated district a name that includes the term “consolidated.” Certified copies of the resolution shall be filed with the Secretary of State and with the county recorder of each county in which is located any part of the consolidated district. Upon the filing, the districts are consolidated into a single consolidated district with all the rights, privileges, and powers of a district. The consolidated district shall succeed to all the funds and other property, and is subject to all the indebtedness, bonded and otherwise, of the districts consolidated. Each district that is included in the consolidated district shall continue in existence for the purpose of representation on the board of the consolidated district, and for the purpose of levying, assessing, and collecting assessments for district purposes. The board of the consolidated district is, however, the board of each district that is included in the consolidated district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 23.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.110.

Upon the adoption of a resolution consolidating two or more districts, the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of table grape acreage shall immediately appoint a board of directors of at least five members, including at least one member from each of the districts that are included in the consolidated district, and at least two members from each county, if districts located in more than one county are included in the consolidated district. If any of the districts that are included in the consolidated district includes more than 15,000 acres of table grape acreage, the board of directors shall be increased by one additional director for each 10,000 acres, or fraction of 10,000 acres, in any one district that is included in the consolidated district. If the consolidated districts are located in more than two counties, the board of directors of the consolidated district shall have at least seven members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.111.

The board of a consolidated district has all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the board of any other district organized pursuant to this article. The members of the consolidated board shall be appointed in the same manner and serve for the same term as the directors of any other district organized pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.112.

Any district that has been included in a consolidated district may withdraw from the consolidated district and be reconstituted as a separate district by filing with the board of directors of the consolidated district a petition for withdrawal that is signed by the owners of not less than a majority, by area, of table grape acreage in the district. The board of directors of the consolidated district shall send the original petition to the board of supervisors of the county in which the withdrawing district is located, and a copy of the petition to the board of supervisors of each of the other counties in which is located any part of the consolidated district. Upon receipt of a petition for withdrawal, the board of supervisors of the county in which the withdrawing district is located shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition. Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in the same manner and with the same effect as prescribed for the formation of a district pursuant to Sections 6047.70, 6047.71, 6047.72, 6047.73, and 6047.74. Upon withdrawal of a district, all moneys collected from the district for the use of the consolidated district, and all property purchased with these moneys, shall remain the property of the consolidated district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 24.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.113.

Upon the filing of a petition with the board of supervisors that is signed by either (1) 50 percent or more of the table grape acreage owners who own 65 percent or more of the affected acreage or by (2) 65 percent or more of the table grape acreage owners who own 50 percent or more of the affected acreage requesting the dissolution of the district, the board of supervisors shall set a time and place for hearing on the petition, which shall not be less than 20 days, or more than 40 days, after the filing of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 25.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.114.

The board of supervisors shall give notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the petition for dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.115.

The notice of hearing shall state all of the following:

(a) That a petition has been filed requesting the dissolution of the district.

(b) That the petition is available for inspection at the offices of the board of supervisors.

(c) The time and place for the hearing.

(d) That at the hearing protests against the dissolution of the district shall be considered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.116.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.117.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.118.

If, at the hearing, a majority of the board of supervisors does not find a compelling reason to override the owners’ petition to dissolve the district, the board of supervisors shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 26.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.119.

The board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be recorded in the office of the county recorder and shall file a certified copy of it with the Secretary of State. Thereupon, the district is dissolved for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.120.

Upon dissolution, the right, title, and interest to property owned or controlled by the district that is situated within the corporate limits of any city shall vest absolutely in the city. If the property is situated outside the corporate limits of a city, it shall vest in the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.121.

The board of supervisors is ex officio the governing body of the dissolved district. It may levy assessments and perform other acts solely for the purpose and as may be necessary to wind up the affairs of the district and to raise money for the payment of any outstanding indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.122.

All claims and accounts against the district that have not been settled by the board within 90 days after the resolution is recorded pursuant to Section 6047.119 shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district was located, or in the case of a consolidated district to the board of supervisors of the county in which is located the largest area of table grape acreage, and shall be passed and approved by the board of supervisors in the same manner as county claims and shall be paid out of the funds of the dissolved district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.123.

If there are insufficient funds to discharge all claims and accounts brought pursuant to Section 6047.122, the board of supervisors shall, at the time of levying the next general county taxes, levy a special assessment upon the net acreage devoted to the growing of table grapes that benefited from the dissolved district in an amount sufficient to discharge all outstanding claims and accounts against the district. In the case of a consolidated district, the board of supervisors of each county in which a portion of the district is located shall levy a special assessment based upon the ratio that the proportion of outstanding claims and accounts bears to the net acreage of the district in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.124.

Owners of wine grapes and raisin grapes and any other agricultural commodities may petition to become subject to any district established pursuant to this article. The petition shall adhere to all the requirements of this article and shall require the approval of the board of directors of the affected district. All provisions of this article are hereby incorporated in this section and are applicable to owners who become subject to a district established pursuant to this article as though set forth in full in this section unless a provision in this article expressly states that it is not applicable to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 27.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Hydrilla [6048. - 6049.]

6048.

(a) The plant hydrilla (Hydrilla verticillata) is a noxious aquatic weed not native to the State of California. The Legislature hereby declares that the further introduction and spread of this serious aquatic weed pest would be detrimental to the state, causing irreparable damage to the agricultural industry and recreational use of streams, lakes, and waterways and further that the eradication of this aquatic weed pest is essential to the preservation of the environment.

Hydrilla can be introduced into the state in shipments of fish and aquatic plants for wholesale and retail sale within the state. It can become established when aquariums containing hydrilla are dumped into California’s streams, lakes, ponds, and waterways. Subsequent spread is rapid, both naturally and artificially.

(b) It is unlawful to produce, propagate, harvest, possess, sell, or distribute hydrilla as such or incidental to the sale of fish, aquatic plants, or other hosts or possible carriers of hydrilla. The director may adopt quarantine or other regulations which prohibit the importation of hydrilla. Any violation of the regulations or of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than seventy-five dollars ($75) for the first offense and is a misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense within three years of a prior conviction of a violation of this section or of the regulations. These penalty provisions do not preclude civil action as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5021) of Chapter 1.

(c) The director shall conduct an ongoing survey and detection program for hydrilla. Whenever and wherever hydrilla is discovered, the director shall immediately investigate the feasibility of eradication. If eradication is feasible, the director shall perform the eradication in cooperation with federal, city, county, and other state agencies taking those steps and actions the director deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 752, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6049.

The department, with the cooperation of the University of California, the United States Department of Agriculture, or other agencies, may develop and implement biological control methods to eradicate or control the aquatic weed pest hydrilla (Hydrilla verticillata) in any area of the state, and may conduct studies for those purposes. When the development or implementation involves the use of fish, each individual program for development or implementation shall first be approved by the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 752, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Cotton Pests Abatement Districts [6051. - 6085.]

6051.

Cotton pests abatement districts may be organized and established by the board of supervisors of the Counties of Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and may exercise the powers expressly granted, or necessarily implied, by those provisions.

The district may include land in more than one of the counties listed in this section with the consent of the board of supervisors of the counties affected. The county which includes the majority of acreage in the district shall be designated the
 principal county. The agricultural commissioner and county officers in the principal county shall perform the acts required by the provisions of this chapter. District funds shall be deposited in the treasury of the principal county.

Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code and the District Reorganization Act of 1965 do not apply to cotton pests abatement districts organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6052.

In order to propose the organization of a cotton pests abatement district, a petition shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county where the lands included within the proposed district are situated. The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments. The petition shall be signed by 25 percent of the cottongrowers or by 25 cottongrowers who grow cotton within the proposed district, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

Upon receipt of the petition, the board of supervisors shall direct the agricultural commissioner to create a register of all cottongrowers growing cotton within the proposed district describing the net acreage of land devoted to the growing of cotton by each grower.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.

The commissioner shall file the cottongrowers register within 60 days of receipt of the order from the board of supervisors or by March 1st, whichever date is the later. The commissioner shall file with the register of cottongrowers a report and recommendation to the board of supervisors on whether conditions of disease, insect, or other pests of cotton warrant the board of supervisors in proceeding with the organization of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

The proponents of the formation of the district may, within 30 days of the receipt by the board of supervisors of the register of cottongrowers from the agricultural commissioner, file with the board of supervisors a petition for the establishment of the district signed by not less than 50 percent of the cottongrowers who grow not less than 65 percent of the cotton within the proposed district or not less than 65 percent of the cottongrowers who grow not less than 50 percent of the cotton grown within the proposed district.

The petition presented to the board of supervisors
 pursuant to Section 6052 shall satisfy the requirements of this section if it contains the number of signatures required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6056.

Upon receipt of the petition, the board of supervisors shall immediately refer the petition to the agricultural commissioner who shall examine it by reference to the register of cottongrowers, and shall, within 15 days after receiving the petition, return the petition to the board of supervisors with his or her certificate attached thereto certifying from the cottongrowers register that the petition qualifies as valid. The certificate of the agricultural commissioner shall be conclusive as to the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6057.

At its meeting at which the certificate is received from the agricultural commissioner, or at its next meeting, regular or special, thereafter, the board of supervisors shall by order fix a time and place for hearing the petition, which time shall be not less than 20 days nor more than 40 days from the date of the order, and shall give notice of the hearing by publication of the time and place thereof with a general statement of the purpose of the proposed district, together with a description of the boundaries of the proposed district, once a week for two successive weeks immediately prior to the date fixed for the
 hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the district will be situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6058.

At the hearing, the board of supervisors shall make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed district as they determine to be advisable, and shall determine and describe the boundaries of the district. The board of supervisors shall not modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the district any lands growing or capable of growing cotton which would be benefited by the formation of the district. The board of supervisors shall, at the hearing, hear all competent and relevant testimony, in support of the petition, and in opposition thereto, and shall determine whether the petition complies with the requirements
 of this chapter. The determination of the board of supervisors shall be entered upon the minutes of the meeting. No defect in the contents of the petition, or in the title to, or form of, the notice or signature, shall vitiate any proceeding thereon if the petition has a sufficient number of qualified signatures attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6059.

The board of supervisors shall, at the next regular or special meeting following the hearing upon the question of the organization of the proposed district, meet and, if it determines that the evidence presented at the hearing was sufficient to warrant the organization of the district, shall, by order entered upon its minutes, declare the district duly organized under the name designated in the petition. The order shall describe the boundaries of the district so that all lands included in it may be known, and a copy of the order shall be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county where the
 district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.

The board of supervisors shall, at the meeting at which the order declaring the district to be organized is made, appoint a board of five directors to administer the affairs of the district. No person shall, at any time, be eligible to hold the office of director of any district unless he or she is a resident of the state, and a cottongrower, either individually or as a joint tenant of, or is a member of a partnership which owns, or is an officer of, a corporation which grows cotton within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.

Each director so appointed shall, in the manner provided by law, give official bond for the faithful performance of his or her duties in the amount which shall be fixed by the board of supervisors, and shall subscribe the oath of office, and the bonds and oaths shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the district is situated. From and after the filing for record of the order declaring it organized and the appointment and qualifying of its board of directors, the organization of the district shall be complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6062.

Any cotton pests abatement district organized pursuant to this chapter may do all of the following:

(a) Have perpetual succession.

(b) Sue and be sued for all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(c) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(d) Take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease or otherwise, and to hold, use,
 and enjoy, and to lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and convenient exercise of its powers.

(e) Prohibit the planting, growing, or maintenance of cotton plants within the boundaries of the district if it determines that such a prohibition is necessary for cotton pest control.

(f) Charge fees for permits to plant cotton. The fees shall be used for the purpose of paying any obligation of the district and to accomplish the purposes of the district in the manner herein provided.

(g) Make contracts, and to employ, except as otherwise provided herein, all persons, firms, and corporations necessary to carry out the purposes and the powers of the district, at such salary, wage, or other compensation as the board of
 directors shall determine.

(h) Eradicate, remove, or prevent the spread of any disease, insect, or other pest injurious to cotton.

(i) Eradicate, eliminate, remove, or destroy any cotton plants except those cotton plants which are growing under the conditions established by a valid permit.

(j) Enter into or upon any land included in the district for the purpose of inspecting cotton growing thereon.

(k) Commence and prosecute appropriate actions to have it adjudged that any cotton plant growing within the district infested with disease, insects, or pests injurious to cotton; or any cotton plant growing within the district without a valid permit; is a public nuisance, and have it decreed that the nuisance be abated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6063.

The general control and management of each district shall be vested in a board of directors of five members. Directors shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred by them in and about the performance of any duties required by the board of directors to be performed by them for the district. All claims presented by any director shall be subject to the approval of three other members of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6064.

The term of office of the directors shall be four years, except for those first appointed upon the organization of the district. The first appointees shall, immediately upon their appointment, classify themselves by lot so that the terms of three of them shall expire on the first day of May following the first biennial election of the district and the terms of the other two shall expire on the first day of May following the second biennial election of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6065.

In the event of a vacancy in the board of directors either by resignation, death, or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the board of supervisors and the person so appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the term of his or her predecessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6066.

The board of directors of each district shall have the power to appoint and to fix the compensation of a secretary of the district who shall keep all records and perform such other duties as are ordered by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6067.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all acts of the board of directors shall be by resolution, and the adoption of a resolution shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6068.

The powers conferred upon any cotton pests abatement district and its board of directors by the provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to be in lieu of other disease, pest, or insect control statutes, but an addition thereto, and no act of any district or of any of its directors, agents, or employees shall operate to deprive or hinder the duly appointed or designated state, county, or federal authorities in conducting any operation for the eradication or control or prevention of any disease, insect, or pest in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6069.

The agricultural commissioner of the county in which any district is situated, may, without fee or charge, supervise and direct, in accordance with the best known accepted methods as determined by the board of directors, all inspection, eradication, fumigation, and other activities undertaken by the district. The agricultural commissioner shall employ any and all assistants required in and about any such work, and the district shall bear and pay all expenses incurred in and about the work. Alternatively, the board of directors may employ a manager to carry out those duties and may employ such personnel as are
 necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.

The board of supervisors in every county where a district has been organized and exists under the provisions of this chapter shall direct the agricultural commissioner to file with the board of supervisors on March 1st of each year a register of every cottongrower intending to grow cotton during the growing season immediately following that date, describing the net acreage of land to be devoted to the growing of cotton by each grower. The agricultural commissioner shall submit a preliminary estimate of the information required to be filed on March 1st in order for
 the board to prepare the district budget.

The agricultural commissioner shall submit a copy of the register to the clerk of the board of supervisors during election years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.

The board of directors of each district shall, on or before the first Monday in February of each year, prepare and file with the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated, a budget setting forth all estimated expenditures of the district for the fiscal year commencing on the first day of the month of April of that fiscal year. The budget shall include any estimated expenditures for special benefits which will affect only certain properties. The board of directors may submit the budget or a revised budget to the board of supervisors later than the first Monday in February, but not later than
 March 15, if necessary in order to properly reflect changes in the acreage involved between the preliminary estimate and the register prepared pursuant to Section 6070 and the costs of programs therefor. A copy of the budget shall, at the same time, be filed with the auditor of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6072.

The board of supervisors of the county may annually establish a fee for a permit to grow cotton within each cotton pests abatement district situated within the county and shall issue the permit to any cottongrower who satisfies the requirements of this chapter. The board of supervisors shall determine the amount of the fee by dividing the budget by the number of acres which will be devoted to cotton production during the ensuing growing season as reported on the register of cottongrowers submitted to the board of supervisors on March 1st of each year. Special benefits which are included in the budget shall be paid